tr: Kum püskürtme uygulaması: Perdahlama; Zımparalama; Diğer
it: Applicazione della sabbiatrice: Lucidatura; Levigatura; Altro
zh-TW: 噴砂機應用: 拋光墊; 打磨; 其他
de: Anwendung des Sandstrahlers: Polier; Schleifen; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Smėliapūtės paskirtis: Poliravimas; Smėliavimas; Kita
th: การใช้งานเครื่องพ่นทราย: การขัด; การขัดกระดาษทราย; อื่นๆ
cs: Aplikace pískovače: Leštění; Pískování; Jiné
sv: Tillämpning för sandbläster: Polering; Sandning; Övrigt
ja: サンドブラスターの用途: 研磨; サンディング; その他
hu: Homokfúvó alkalmazási területe: Polírozás; Csiszolás; Egyéb
pl: Zastosowanie piaskarki: Polerowanie; Piaskowanie; Inne
ru: Применение пескоструйного аппарата: Полировка; Шлифовка; Другой
pt-BR: Aplicação de jato de areia: Polimento; Lixar; Outro
hr-HR: Primjena alata za pjeskarenje: Poliranje; Brušenje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Funcție aparat de sablat: Lustruire; Sablare; Altele
nl: Toepassing zandstraler: Polijsten; Schuren; Andere
nb: Bruk av sandblåser: Polering; Sliping; Annet
ko: 모래 분사기 적용: 연마; 샌딩; 기타
en: Sandblaster application: Polishing; Sanding; Other
el: Εφαρμογή εργαλείου αμμοβολής: Στίλβωμα; Αμμοβολήο; Άλλο
da: Anvendelse af sandblæsning: Polering; Slibning; Andet
sk-SK: Použitie pieskovača: Leštenie; Brúsenie; Iné
es: Aplicación de arenadora: Pulido; Lijado; Otros
vi: Ứng dụng thiết bị phun cát: Mài bóng; Rải cát; Khác
fi: Hiekkapuhallussovellus: Kiillotus; Hionta; Muu
sl-SI: Uporaba peskalnika: Poliranje; Brušenje; Drugo
fr: Application du jet de sable: Polissage; Ponçage; Autre
zh-CN: 喷砂机应用: 抛光; 砂磨; 其他
pt-PT: Aplicação Sandblaster: Polimento; Lixamento; Outro
bg-BG: Приложение на пясъкоструйка: Полиране; Шлифоване; Други